Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,129
Class V school district; sale of site; petition; parties to action; summons.

The city of the metropolitan class holding title to such real estate as described in section 79-10,127 and the State of Nebraska, grantor in the original deed to the city, shall be made parties defendant in such proceedings and served with summons as in civil actions.

Laws 1955, c. 319, § 3, p. 985;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1063;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 775.